Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2338HV (1) 91 sb/js H.F. 763 Section 1. Section 476.13, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. a. Notwithstanding the Iowa 3 administrative procedure Act, chapter 17A, prior to final 4 commission action, an applicant before the commission under 5 this chapter or a person whose real property is subject to an 6 eminent domain taking claim arising from an application before 7 the commission may petition the district court for an eminent 8 domain declaratory review. 9 b. The district court for Polk county shall have exclusive 10 venue for the judicial review under this subsection. 11 c. Relief under this subsection is limited to a declaration 12 of the partiesâ rights, status, and other legal matters 13 relating to the constitutional and statutory provisions 14 governing eminent domain takings. 15 d. The court may combine several substantially similar 16 petitions into one review or relief order at its own discretion 17 or upon the application of any party. 18 e. All orders or judgments under this subsection may be 19 reviewed as other judgments, orders, or decrees. 20 f. This subsection does not limit the authority of the 21 commission to proceed with an application under consideration 22 at the time of the petition. 23 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. a. A person whose real property is 24 subject to an eminent domain taking claim arising from an 25 application before the commission may commence a new action 26 under subsection 4 if any of the following conditions apply: 27 (1) More than eighteen months have passed after the 28 commencement of an action described in subsection 4 involving 29 the person. 30 (2) The facts and circumstances as presented in a previous 31 proceeding under subsection 4 materially differ from the facts 32 and circumstances at the time of the commencement of the new 33 action. 34 b. Notwithstanding subsection 4, paragraph âbâ , the new 35 -1- LSB 2338HV (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 3 H.F. 763 proceeding must be in a district court of a county other than 1 Polk county, and the district judge assigned to the matter 2 must be a district judge other than the judge who presided in 3 the previous action under subsection 4. The court shall make 4 all determinations of fact and law in the new action de novo, 5 giving no precedential value to determinations in the earlier 6 action. 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. Commencement of a declaratory action 8 under subsection 4 or 5 must be accompanied by a fee of ten 9 dollars, payable to the clerk of the district court of the 10 county in which the action is commenced. Fees collected under 11 this subsection shall be deposited in the general fund of the 12 state. 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. A bond shall not be required for 14 an appeal of any order entered in an action arising from 15 subsection 4 or 5, or for any injunction to enforce an order 16 entered pursuant to subsection 4 or 5. 17